Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2225.01
Intrastate funding formula; department; duties.

(1) The department, after consultation with the area agencies on aging, shall develop and use an intrastate funding formula for the allocation to area agencies on aging of state and federal funds awarded pursuant to the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and the Older Americans Act, as now or hereafter amended.

(2) The area agencies on aging shall comply with the intrastate funding formula determined by the department.

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 27.